Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 5973YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2525 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 46. a. (1) Subtract, to the extent 3 included, income resulting from loan repayments received under 4 a program agreement entered into by a taxpayer who is a loan 5 repayment recipient and the Iowa college student aid commission 6 pursuant to section 256.226, if the taxpayer fulfills the 7 obligation to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine 8 according to terms of that section and the program agreement. 9 (2) The deduction in subparagraph (1) shall not exceed the 10 following limits: 11 (a) For any tax year, fifteen thousand dollars. 12 (b) For the aggregate of all tax years, sixty thousand 13 dollars. 14 (c) In any case, the amount of the outstanding eligible 15 loan. 16 b. (1) Subtract, to the extent not already excluded, the 17 amount of interest paid by a veterinarian during the tax year 18 on a qualified education loan for attendance at an accredited 19 or approved college of veterinary medicine, if the veterinarian 20 practiced veterinary medicine in the state during the tax year. 21 (2) The deduction in this paragraph âbâ shall not be allowed 22 when the taxpayer is receiving a loan repayment pursuant to 23 section 256.226 in the same tax year. 24 (3) As used in this paragraph âbâ : 25 (a) âAccredited or approved college of veterinary medicineâ 26 means the same as defined in section 169.3. 27 (b) âQualified education loanâ means the same as defined in 28 section 221 of the Internal Revenue Code. 29 (c) âVeterinarianâ means the same as defined in section 30 169.3. 31 (d) âVeterinary medicineâ means the same as defined in 32 section 169.3. 33 c. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34 17A to administer this subsection including the number of days 35 -1- LSB 5973YH (2) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2525 of veterinarian practice required in this state in order to be 1 eligible for the deduction under paragraph âbâ . 2 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 3 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 4 or after that date. 5